California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(1) As a condition of providing nonemergency medical care to an indigent and dependent adult resident of the county, other than an involuntary detainee or prisoner, who is a sponsored person who is not a citizen or national of the United States, a county may require that the legal sponsor of the person sign a written agreement to repay any aid provided to the person during the period of time during which the sponsor has agreed, in writing, to provide for the person who is not a citizen or national of the United States.

(2) To the
 extent not inconsistent with federal law, if a county has provided emergency medical care to an indigent and dependent adult resident of the county, other than an involuntary detainee or prisoner, who is a sponsored person who is not a citizen or national of the United States and that care was provided during the period during which the sponsor has agreed, in writing, to provide for the person, the county may recover the reasonable cost of that care from the sponsor of that person. If the county is required to take legal action to enforce this right to recovery, the written promise to provide for the person shall be considered, under state law, to be the equivalent of a written contract to pay for that medical care.

(3) No county shall be required to provide medical care to any sponsored person who is eligible, with or without a share of cost,
 for participation in the California Medical Assistance (Medi-Cal) program.

(b) This section shall not apply if the sponsoring person dies or the sponsoring organization ceases to exist.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to any person who is not a citizen or national of the United States who is:

(1) Admitted to the United States as a result of the application, prior to April 1, 1980, of the provisions of Section 1153 (c) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(2) Admitted to the United States as a result of the application, after March 31, 1980, of Section 1157(c) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(3) Paroled into the United States under Section 1182(d)(5) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(4) Granted political asylum by the United States Attorney General under Section 1158 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(5) A Cuban or Haitian entrant, as defined in Section 501(e) of the Refugee Education Assistance Act of 1980 (Public Law 96-422).

(6) A minor and the sponsor or the sponsor’s spouse is the parent of the child.

(d) This section shall become operative on the effective date of federal law that prohibits providing Medi-Cal assistance to sponsored persons who are not citizens or
 nationals of the United States, and shall remain operative only as long as federal law remains in effect. The Director of Health Services shall determine the operative dates of this section pursuant to this subdivision and shall execute a declaration, that shall be retained by the director, that sets forth the operative date or termination date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 82.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Section operative on date prescribed by its own provisions.    Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (d).)
-------------------------------------------

17002.

The boards of supervisors may establish almshouses and county farms, prescribe rules and regulations for their government and management, and appoint the necessary officers and employees thereof, who shall hold office during the pleasure of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17003.

Every county may give such emergency relief to dependent nonresidents as the respective boards of supervisors deem necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17004.

If no other funds are available for the purpose, a county may incur all necessary expenses in transporting a nonresident indigent to another state or county, when information at hand reasonably tends to show that the person has a legal residence in such state or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17005.

If a dispute occurs between counties as to the responsibility for an indigent, either county may submit the dispute to the department. The decision of the department thereon shall be final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17006.

(a) The board of supervisors of every county as a board, or by committee or by any person or society as it may authorize, shall investigate every application for relief from the funds of the county, shall supervise by periodic visitation every person receiving that relief, shall devise ways and means for bringing persons unable to maintain themselves to self-support, and shall keep full and complete records of the investigation, supervision, relief, and rehabilitation as shall be prescribed by the department. These records shall be confidential and shall not be open to examination or inspection, except by the grand jury of the county or by a board or an officer of the state or the county charged with the supervision or direction of that relief or with the control or expenditure of funds applicable to that relief. Any citizen shall be entitled to demand and receive from the board, officer, committee, person, or society having custody of these records a statement of the amount, character, and value of the relief received by any person.

(b) (1) This section shall not be construed to prohibit an employee of a county welfare department from disclosing confidential information concerning a public social services applicant or recipient to a state or local law enforcement agency investigating or gathering information regarding a criminal act committed in a welfare department office, a criminal act against any county or state welfare worker, or any criminal act witnessed by any county or state welfare worker while involved in the administration of public social services at any location. Further, this section shall not be construed to prohibit an employee of a county welfare department from disclosing confidential information concerning a public social services applicant or recipient to a state or local law enforcement agency investigating or gathering information regarding a criminal act intentionally committed by an applicant or recipient against any off-duty county or state welfare worker in retaliation for an act performed in the course of the welfare worker’s duty when the person committing the offense knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a state or county welfare worker.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “criminal act” means only an act that is in violation of state or local law.

(3) Disclosure of confidential information pursuant to this subdivision shall be limited to the applicant’s name, physical description, and address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 591, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17006.1.

Section 17006 does not prohibit sharing of confidential information for purposes directly connected with the administration of relief from the funds of any California county or for purposes directly connected with the administration of public social services as defined by Section 10051.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 110, Sec. 1.   (SB 462)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17006.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 17006, the board, officer, committee, person, or society having custody of the records cited in Section 17006 may disclose to any law enforcement agency:

(1) The name, address, birthdate, social security number, physical description, and physical whereabouts of any person receiving relief, if a warrant has been issued for the arrest of the person for the commission of a felony or misdemeanor.

The board, officer, committee, person, or society having custody of the records may release the information specified by this subdivision to any law enforcement agency upon a written request from the agency specifying that a warrant of arrest for the commission of a felony or misdemeanor has been issued as to the applicant or recipient. This request may be made only by the head of the law enforcement agency or by an employee of the agency so authorized and identified by name and title by the head of the agency, in writing, to the county welfare department. It is the intent of this section that a county welfare department shall notify all applicants of public social services that release of confidential information of their records will not be protected if there is a felony or misdemeanor arrest warrant against the applicant. A recipient of public social services shall be notified at the time of renewal of his or her application for relief of release of confidential information if there is a felony or misdemeanor arrest warrant issued against the recipient.

(2) The name, address, telephone number, birthdate, social security number, physical description, and physical whereabouts of any person receiving relief upon request of any law enforcement agency specifying that the person is deceased and that the agency is otherwise unable to adequately identify the person.

(3) (A) If in any of the circumstances specified in subparagraph (B), a county welfare department learns that a misdemeanor or felony arrest warrant has been issued for that individual, the county welfare department may report the physical whereabouts of, and other information authorized by this section pertaining to, the applicant or recipient to the appropriate law enforcement agency.

(B) The disclosure of information authorized by subparagraph (A) may be made only if knowledge of the outstanding warrant comes to the attention of the county welfare department as a result of an unsolicited disclosure in one of the following circumstances:

(i) It is received in the process of obtaining or reviewing an application for public social services.

(ii) It is received through a regular investigation for the purposes of determining or reviewing eligibility for public social services.

(iii) It is received from an independent source.

(b) This section shall not be construed to authorize the release of a general list identifying individuals applying for or receiving public relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 227, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17007.

No fee shall be charged by any public officer for filing any petition for guardianship or conservatorship under the provisions of Section 17403, or for any official act done or necessary in the course thereof, except that a county employee acting as such guardian or conservator shall be entitled to such costs therefor as will reimburse him in full for moneys advanced by him in such guardianship or conservatorship.

Where a county officer or employee is appointed and acts as such guardian or conservator, the board of supervisors may, by resolution, order that expenses necessary in the conduct of the guardianship or conservatorship and any necessary premiums on the bond of the guardian or conservator be advanced by the county to such guardian or conservator, and such expenses shall be a charge against the county, but the county shall be reimbursed out of any funds or property of the estate of the ward or conservatee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

17008.

In cases in which an indigent has an interest in the real property upon which he resides, a county may allow an amount that would otherwise be included in his budget for rentals, when such amount is necessary and will be used entirely for the purpose of preserving so far as possible the retention of such interest to provide a place of residence for the indigent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17009.

The board of supervisors may provide for the burial or cremation of the indigent dead and may provide for the maintenance of the graves of such dead.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17015.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the board of supervisors of each county or the agency authorized by county charter may deny eligibility for aid under this part to any person who is found by a federal or state court, or pursuant to a special administrative hearing meeting the requirements of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, including any determination made on the basis of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, to have done any of the following acts for the purpose of establishing or maintaining the family’s eligibility for aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3, Article 5 (commencing with Section 12200) of Chapter 3 of Part 3, or Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6, or increasing, or preventing a reduction in, the amount of that aid:

(1) Making a false or misleading statement or misrepresenting, concealing, or withholding facts.

(2) Committing any act intended to mislead, misrepresent, conceal, or withhold facts or propound a falsity.

(b) A period of ineligibility imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be limited to the period of ineligibility imposed by the court or administrative agency in the procedure described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17016.

(a) An individual shall not be eligible for aid under this part if he or she is either:

(1) Fleeing to avoid prosecution, or custody and confinement after conviction, under the laws of the place from which the individual is fleeing, for a crime or an attempt to commit a crime that is a felony under the laws of the place from which the individual is fleeing, or which, in the case of the State of New Jersey, is a high misdemeanor under the laws of that state.

(2) Violating a condition of probation or parole imposed under federal law or the law of any state.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply with respect to conduct of an individual for any month beginning after the President of the United States grants a pardon with respect to the conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 178.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

17020.

Any person who is eligible for aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 shall not be eligible for monthly payments provided pursuant to this part if the maximum payment standard established by a county pursuant to Section 17001 exceeds the payment level established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11450.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 91, Sec. 35.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

17021.

(a) Any individual who is not eligible for aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 as a result of the 48-month limitation specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11454 shall not be eligible for aid or assistance under this part until all of the children of the individual on whose behalf aid was received, whether or not currently living in the home with the individual, are 18 years of age or older.

(b) Any individual who is receiving aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 on behalf of an eligible child, but who is either ineligible for aid or whose needs are not otherwise taken into account in determining the amount of aid to the family pursuant to Section 11450 due to the imposition of a sanction or penalty, shall not be
 eligible for aid or assistance under this part.

(c) This section shall not apply to health care benefits provided under this part.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 17021, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 81.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

17021.

(a) Any individual who is not eligible for aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 as a result of the 60-month limitation specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11454 shall not be eligible for aid or assistance under this part until all of the children of the individual on whose behalf aid was received, whether or not currently living in the home with the individual, are 18 years of age or older.

(b) Any individual who is receiving aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 on behalf of an eligible child, but who is either ineligible for aid or whose needs are not otherwise taken into account in determining the amount of aid to the family pursuant to Section 11450 due to the imposition of a sanction or
 penalty, shall not be eligible for aid or assistance under this part.

(c) This section shall not apply to health care benefits provided under this part.

(d) This section shall become operative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 82.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17030.

Nothing in Section 10000, 17000, or 17001 or any other provision of law shall require any county or city and county to provide or pay for a service reduced or eliminated from the Medi-Cal program, pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3, to a person otherwise eligible to receive services under the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 140.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

17030.1.

Nothing in Section 10000, 17000, or 17001 or any other provision of law shall require any county or city and county to provide or pay for a service reduced or eliminated from the Medi-Cal program, pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3, to a person otherwise eligible for care pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 72, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Eligibility [17100. - 17111.]

17100.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person, in order to be entitled to aid, shall be a resident of the state and of the county wherein application is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17101.

The residence is the place where one remains when not called elsewhere for labor or other special or temporary purpose, and to which he returns in seasons of repose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17102.

The residence of an unmarried minor child is the residence of the parent or parents with whom a child maintains his or her place of abode or of the parent who has the legal custody of the minor.

The residence of an orphan is that of the last deceased person who had his or her legal custody.

The residence of a dependent child who has been declared free from the custody and control of his or her parent or parents, by order of the juvenile court, is not changed by change of the residence of the parent or parents.

The provisions of this section apply to the extent not in conflict with federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1129.)
-------------------------------------------

17103.

Neither the domicile nor residence of a spouse shall be deemed to be the domicile or residence of the other spouse, and each spouse shall establish his or her own domicile or residence dependent upon proof of the fact and not upon legal presumptions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

17104.

A refugee who is eligible for, and is required to participate in, an alternative project implemented pursuant to Section 412(e)(7) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (Section 1522(e)(7) of Title 8 of the United States Code), shall not be eligible for benefits under this part. This section shall apply only when a alternative project uses a payment level for project participants that is substantially equal to the payment level in effect for persons receiving aid under this part, with respect to both cash and in-kind payments, and if the assistance provided to the alternative project participant is considered a grant rather than a loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1311, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

17105.

A person who is a resident of California within the meaning of this chapter is a lawful resident of the county wherein he applies for aid, if he has resided therein continuously for one year immediately preceding his application for assistance. If the applicant has no such residence, the county wherein he last resided continuously for one year immediately preceding his application shall be responsible for his support. If the applicant has no such year’s residence within three years preceding application, that county shall be responsible for his support wherein he was present for the longest time during the three-year period. Time spent in a public institution or on parole therefrom or in a private charitable institution shall not in any case be counted in determining the matter of county residence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17106.

The eligibility of an indigent or needy person to receive surplus food under any program supported or sponsored by the federal government shall not be limited by any provision in this chapter, nor shall any county, by ordinance or otherwise, limit the eligibility of such persons to receive such food by the imposition of residence requirements, whether or not such food is distributed by a county agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17107.

The board of supervisors may establish its own policies with reference to the amount of property, if any, a person shall be permitted to have while receiving assistance, to the end that, so far as it is possible, an applicant for public relief shall be required to apply his own property to his support.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17108.

The policies established under Section 17107 shall not deny needed care in a county hospital or contract hospital, as defined in Section 14057.5 of this code, to any person who meets the eligibility requirements for medical assistance for the aged, and shall not require the application of any property of such a person to his support or the taking of any lien upon that property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

17109.

As a condition to the grant or continuation of aid to an indigent, the board of supervisors may require, as security for the moneys so expended, that the applicant transfer or grant to it such property or interest in property as the applicant has, or such portion thereof or estate therein or lien thereon as the board specifies. Such property shall be managed by the board of supervisors and the net income thereof shall be applied to the reimbursement of the county for the aid granted, and any surplus in excess of such reimbursement shall be paid to the indigent. In the case of any estate, interest, or lien in such property held by the board, or any right of management transferred thereto, the board shall have all the powers of an attorney in fact for the indigent as to such estate, interest, or lien, and may sell, lease, or transfer the same, defend and prosecute all suits concerning it, pay all just claims against it and be reimbursed out of the proceeds, and do all things necessary for the protection, preservation, and management thereof. Any such estate, interest, or lien shall be held by the board, subject to the claim of the county for reimbursement for aid granted to the applicant or for moneys expended in its management, preservation, or protection, and such reimbursement shall constitute a preferred claim against such estate, interest, or lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17110.

Whenever the respective boards of supervisors deem it best for the welfare of a family or in the public interest that an indigent remain in a county not responsible for his support, the county responsible for the support of the indigent may agree to support him in the county not so responsible; but no indigent supported in this manner shall be deemed to have acquired a residence in the nonresponsible county. Such agreement shall be made by the responsible county with the nonresponsible county, and a record or copy thereof shall be sent to and filed in the office of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17111.

An applicant or recipient shall be permitted to retain, without effect on his eligibility for aid or the amount of aid to which he is otherwise entitled, the tools of his trade necessary to continue or seek employment and an automobile of reasonable value needed to seek or maintain employment in order to enable the applicant or recipient to become self-supporting. The board of supervisors shall determine what tools of the trade may be retained as necessary and the reasonable value of an automobile used to seek or maintain employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2048.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Work Relief Projects [17200. - 17201.]

17200.

Work may be required of an indigent, who is eligible to receive benefits under Section 17000, and who is not incapacitated by reason of age, disease, or accident, as a condition of relief. This work shall be created for the purpose of assisting in his or her rehabilitation and the preservation of his or her self-respect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 613, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.

Work relief projects conducted pursuant to Section 17200, which consist of the work of repairing or maintaining any shipping facility or public building, shall not be subject to the competitive bidding provisions of Sections 25450 and following of the Government Code where the work is to be done entirely by indigents, except that those providing supervision need not be indigents. In counties employing a purchasing agent, the materials and supplies used in such a project may be purchased by the purchasing agent without limit and without the formality of obtaining bids, letting contracts, preparing specifications, and the other formalities otherwise required by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Relatives’ Responsibility [17300. - 17301.]

17300.

All aid rendered by the county under this part shall be a charge against the responsible relative or relatives of the recipient thereof, and the county rendering aid shall be entitled to reimbursement therefor.

The board of supervisors of the county rendering aid shall determine if the responsible relative or relatives have financial ability to support or contribute to the support of the recipient and were pecuniarily able to support or contribute to the support of the recipient during the time aid was rendered. If in the opinion of the board of supervisors pecuniary ability existed when the aid was given, and exists when the matter comes before the board of supervisors, the board shall request the district attorney or other civil legal officer of the county granting aid to proceed against such responsible relative or relatives.

Upon such request, the district attorney or other civil legal officer shall maintain an action on behalf of the county granting aid against the relative or relatives to recover for the county the aid rendered and to secure an order requiring the payment of any sums which may become due in the future.

The board of supervisors shall, in the case of aid granted by institutional care, fix a reasonable charge therefor, which shall be the measure of reimbursement to the county, and the existence of the order fixing the charge shall constitute prima facie evidence of its reasonableness.

For the purposes of this article, property described in subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section 17409 shall not be considered in determining the financial ability of a responsible relative to support or contribute to the support of the recipient.

For the purposes of this chapter responsible relative or relatives mean the spouse of a recipient and parent of a minor child who is a recipient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 162.)
-------------------------------------------

17301.

In any case where a person so ordered to make such payments fails so to do, the court may by order require him to show cause for such failure, and may otherwise enforce the order to make such payments by such order or orders as in its discretion it deems necessary from time to time, and such order or orders may be modified, altered, or revoked at the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Termination and Recovery of Assistance [17400. - 17410.]

17400.

In any case in which a county has taken a lien against real property owned by a recipient of public assistance for any purpose, including hospitalization or medical care furnished to the recipient, and such lien is subordinate to a mortgage or deed of trust on the property, the county, upon learning of the pending sale of the property in connection with the foreclosure of that mortgage or deed of trust, shall notify the recipient if it has no intention of bidding at the sale or redeeming the property and agrees to subordinate its liens to any subsequent mortgage or deed of trust on the real property so long as the title thereto remains in the name of the recipient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17401.

No lien taken by a county pursuant to Section 17109 for care provided to a person in a county hospital shall be enforced against the home of that person (1) during his lifetime or that of his spouse, or (2) during the minority of his children if they reside in the home, or (3) during the lifetime of any dependent adult child who resides in the home and who is incapable of self-support because of mental or physical disability.

Any lien taken by a county for county hospital care shall be released immediately when the amount owing the county for that care is paid. The county shall render to a person to whom care has been provided in a county hospital a statement setting forth the charges upon which its claim for reimbursement is based. No interest or carrying charge shall be charged in connection with any debt incurred for county hospital care.

If a person against whose home a lien has been imposed for county hospital care desires to sell his home, the county shall release its lien against the original home and transfer it to the new home, provided that it finds that its security will not be impaired. If the person desires to borrow money for the purpose of making improvements to his home, using his home for security, the county shall subordinate its lien to the mortgage or other security interest given for the loan, if the county finds that its security will not be impaired.

If a person against whose home a lien has been imposed for county hospital care has the home acquired by a public entity for public use, the county shall release its lien against the original home and transfer it to any new home the person acquires.

No lien shall be taken pursuant to Section 17109 against the home of a person for care provided him in a county hospital, if he was confined to the county hospital as the result of a diagnosis of tuberculosis.

No lien shall be taken pursuant to this part against the home or other property of any relative, except for a parent of a minor or a spouse, liable for the support of a person confined in a county hospital or otherwise receiving aid under this part.

In no way do the authorizations and limitations expressed in this section enlarge upon the power of counties to take or impose liens under existing law. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to permit a county to impose a lien for aid or other assistance granted under any public assistance program established by this code for which federal funds are received by this state, or under the aid to the potentially self-supporting blind program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

17402.

If there is in the hands of any officer of the county, or there is surrendered to any officer of the county, upon the death of any indigent person, any personal property of a total of less than twenty-five dollars ($25) in value, belonging to such person, the board of supervisors of the county may, by resolution, order such property to be sold, and if the proceeds thereof do not exceed the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25), they shall be applied to the payment of the claim of the county against such person. If the value of such property or the proceeds received from its sale exceeds the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25), or exceeds the indebtedness due to the county, such property or the proceeds of the sale thereof in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25), or the amount of the claims of the county, shall be delivered to the public administrator of the county or to any other legal representative of the deceased for administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17403.

If a person for the support of whom public moneys have been expended acquires property, the county shall have a claim against him to the amount of a reasonable charge for moneys so expended, and such claim shall be enforced by action against him by the district attorney of the county on request of the board of supervisors. In a proper case therefor, the district attorney shall apply to the proper court for the appointment of a guardian or conservator of the person or estate, or both, of the indigent. The support of such indigent from public funds shall be deemed a ground for sale or encumbrance of his property under the provisions of Section 2541 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

17403.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 17403, the county claim for reimbursement of aid extended to the indigent shall be offset as provided herein in cases where: (1) the indigent is represented by an attorney at law or other authorized representative in connection with a denial of, or termination of, Supplemental Security Income benefits with state supplementation under the provisions of Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3; and (2) the county receives the indigent’s initial payment of these benefits pursuant to an interim assistance reimbursement agreement authorized by Section 1631 (g) of the federal Social Security Act.

The amount of offset reducing the county claim in these instances shall be paid to the representative by the county as a representation fee. The county, by appropriate enactment of the board of supervisors, may elect to be exempted from the mandatory obligation to pay representation fees under this section, but the county shall retain the authority, despite such election, to pay a representation fee in such instances as the county may deem appropriate. Any representation fee paid pursuant to this section shall not be recoverable from the indigent or the indigent’s estate.

The representation fee shall be a fixed percentage of the interim assistance reimbursement received by the county equal to the lesser of (1) 25 percent; or (2) the percentage obtained by dividing any representation fee to be paid by the indigent as authorized under federal law by the net benefits paid to the indigent by the county after interim assistance reimbursement and multiplying the quotient by 100.

For purposes of this section, an “authorized representative” shall mean an individual who has met the requirements set forth in Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act and regulations promulgated thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 714, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17404.

From the proceeds of a sale or encumbrance of the property of such ward, or from such funds as may be collected from the property of the ward, there shall be paid to the county the expense of the support of the ward prior to collection, together with the subsequent expense of such support.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17405.

Any estate, interest or lien in property transferred or granted to the board of supervisors under the provisions of Section 17109, or under the provisions of Section 9 of an act entitled “An act to provide for the aid and relief of indigents,” approved June 5, 1933, may be reconveyed or released by them upon payment to the county of the amount of aid repayment of which is thereby secured or upon payment to the county of such amount as in the opinion of the board of supervisors equals the net amount which would be realized in the event that the lien was foreclosed or such estate or interest was sold at forced sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17406.

Any estate, interest, or lien held by the board of supervisors under the provisions of Section 17109, or under the provisions of Section 9 of an act entitled “An act to provide for the aid and relief of indigents,” approved June 5, 1933, may be subordinated by them to the lien of any mortgage or deed of trust given to renew or refinance any mortgage, deed of trust, or other encumbrance, the lien or charge of which had priority over such estate, interest or lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17407.
